District of Columbia statutes.
1-612.38

Voluntary Transfer of Leave Program Report.

On or before February 1 of each year, the Office of Personnel shall provide a Voluntary Transfer of Leave Program Report to the Council. The report shall include:

(1)

A comprehensive list of all voluntary leave bank contributors;

(2)

A comprehensive list of all transfer of leave recipients;

(3)

Documentation demonstrating that proper deductions have been taken from the contributor’s leave accrual;

(4)

Documentation demonstrating the actual transfer of leave to the recipient; and

(5)

If the head of an agency excludes an employee or group of employees from the program under § 1-612.32(d) because an organization or program within the agency would be substantially disrupted in carrying out its functions or would incur additional costs:

(A)

The manner in which the organization or program within the agency would be substantially disrupted in carrying out its functions; or

(B)

The amount of additional costs which will be incurred and the reasons that they will be incurred.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1238
as added Feb. 6, 2004, D.C. Law 15-68, § 2, 50 DCR 9819

Cross References

Mayor and Council members, coverage, see § 1-602.02.
Merit system, continuation of existing laws, see § 1-632.06.
Merit system, effective date provisions, see § 1-636.02.
Merit system, life insurance, withholdings from employees and annuitants, see § 1-622.10.
Public assistance, workers’ compensation, recipients of Temporary Assistance for Needy Families, see § 4-205.19k.
Workers’ compensation, “employee” defined, see § 32-1501.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-612.32.